Maine, session 132, LD2130.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §7054-B, sub-§1, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. "Eligible service member" means a person who is serving on active duty in the
United States Armed Forces including the Reserves of the United States Armed Forces
and the National Guard and a person actively serving in the Reserves of the United
States Armed Forces or the National Guard.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §7054-B, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 438, §2, is amended
to read:
2. Interview. In filling any position in the classified service, the employing agency
shall offer an interview to any veteran or, gold star spouse or spouse of an eligible service
member who meets the minimum qualifications established for the position.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §7054-B, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 438, §2, is amended
to read:
3. Retention preference. In any reduction in personnel in the state service, employees
who are veterans or, gold star spouses or spouses of eligible service members must be
retained in preference to all other competing employees in the same classification with
equal seniority, status and performance reviews.
Page 1 - 132LR2684(03)